Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 26 Criminal Detention Facilities Standards
12-28-406. Acts 1969, No. 377, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-913.

12-28-407. Acts 1969, No. 377, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-911.

12-28-408. Acts 1969, No. 377, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-915.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning a Department of Correction youthful offenders treatment facility, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 559, § 7. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-28-501. Acts 1971, No. 466, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1101.

12-28-502. Acts 1971, No. 466, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1108.

12-28-503. Acts 1971, No. 466, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1103.

12-28-504. Acts 1971, No. 466, §§ 2, 5; 1981, No. 488, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-1102, 46-1105.

12-28-505. Acts 1971, No. 466, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1104.

12-28-506. Acts 1971, No. 466, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1107.

12-28-507. Acts 1971, No. 466, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1106.

Publisher's Notes. Former subchapter 6, concerning prison overcrowding emergency powers, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 418, § 7. The former subchapter was derived from Acts 1983, No. 223, §§ 1-7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-1801 — 46-1807.

Cross References. General powers and duties of Department of Correction, §12-27-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1987, No. 418, § 8: Mar. 26, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is serious overcrowding in the Department of Correction facilities and that such overcrowding is likely to worsen unless appropriate action is taken immediately; that this act is designed to establish a procedure for alleviating this problem and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 684, § 5: Mar. 21, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that at present, the Prison Overcrowding Emergency Powers Act can be invoked by the Board only if the total combined male and female population of the prison system exceeds ninety-eight percent (98%) of the rated capacity; that male and female facilities are separate and either may become overcrowded while the combined total inmate population of the male and female facilities would not meet the ninety-eight percent capacity requirement of the Prison Overcrowding Emergency Powers Act; that it is urgent that the Board be given authority to invoke the Act when either the male facilities or the female facilities exceeds ninety-eight percent of capacity level; that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 1721, § 5: Apr. 22, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that overcrowding in the state prisons must be addressed immediately; that this act does so; and that this act must go into effect as soon as possible in order to help assure that our citizens are protected from the dangerous elements of society. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Cited: Wells v. Walker, 852 F.2d 368 (8th Cir. 1988).

History.

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 774.

12-26-105. Criminal detention facility review committee districts and committees created — Members.